Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20252-5001
Legislative findings; termination.

Sections 2-5001 to 2-5006 terminate on July 1, 2026. The Legislature finds that it is in the interest of the people of the state that the practice of aquaculture be encouraged in order to promote agricultural diversification, augment food supplies, expand employment opportunities, promote economic activity, increase stocks of fish and other aquatic life, protect and better use and manage the natural resources of the state, and provide other benefits to the state.

Laws 1993, LB 830, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 5.